Utah statutes.
16-6a-206.   Bylaws.

(1) (a)  The board of directors of a nonprofit corporation may adopt initial bylaws for the nonprofit corporation.

(b)  If no directors of the nonprofit corporation have been elected, the incorporators may adopt initial bylaws for the nonprofit corporation.

(c)  If neither the incorporators nor the board of directors have adopted initial bylaws, the members, if any, may adopt initial bylaws.

(2)  The bylaws of a nonprofit corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the nonprofit corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation, including management and regulation of the nonprofit corporation in the event of an emergency.

